Georgia, session 2025_26, HB764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for a new charter for the City of Nelson, approved April 7, 1992 (Ga. L.
1992, p. 5615), as amended, particularly by an Act approved April 9, 1993 (Ga. L. 1993,
p. 5181), is amended by revising subsection (b) of Section 2.12 as follows:
"(b) In the event the office of the mayor or city council member becomes vacant, the city
council shall order a special election to fill the balance of the unexpired term of such
official. The city council or those members remaining shall appoint a member to fill such
vacancy until the special election is held and a successor is elected and qualified. The
special election shall be held and conducted in accordance with Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the
O.C.G.A., the 'Georgia Election Code,' as now or hereinafter amended."
H. B. 764
- 1 -

LC 62 0134/AP
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 764
- 2 -